Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-901
Medical Assistance Act, how cited.

Sections 68-901 to 68-9,113 shall be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB830, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB27, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB342, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB396, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB1106, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB525, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB541, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB599, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB500, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB268, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB578, § 1;

Initiative Law 2018, No. 427, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB468, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB726, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB956, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 43;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1158, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB100, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 57;

Laws 2024, LB204, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB358, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB857, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB958, § 1.
April 17, 2026
By enacting the Medical Assistance Act, Nebraska elected to participate in the federal Medicaid program; therefore, the State must comply with federal Medicaid statutes and regulations. Smalley v. Nebraska Dept. of Health & Human Servs., 283 Neb. 544, 811 N.W.2d 246 (2012).